Utah statutes.
17-50-305.   County powers to acquire, construct, and control roads and
other facilities -- Retainage.
(1) A county may:
(a)  contract for, purchase, or otherwise acquire, when necessary, rights of
way for county roads over private property, and may institute proceedings for
acquiring such rights of way as provided by law;
(b)  lay out, construct, maintain, control, and manage county roads,
sidewalks, ferries and bridges within the county, outside of cities and towns;
(c)  designate the county roads to be maintained by the county within or
extending through any city or town, which may not be more than three in the
same direction;
(d)  abolish or abandon county roads that are unnecessary for the use of the
public, in the manner provided by law; and
(e)  lay out, construct, maintain, control, and manage landing fields and
hangars for the use of airplanes or other vehicles for aerial travel.
(2)  If any payment on a contract with a private contractor to construct
county roads, sidewalks, ferries, and bridges under this section is retained
or withheld, it shall be retained or withheld and released as provided in
Section 13-8-5.
